Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-131
Employment by state and political subdivisions; policy.

It is the policy of this state that persons with disabilities shall be employed by the state, the political subdivisions of the state, the public schools, and all other employment supported in whole or in part by public funds on the same terms and conditions as persons without disabilities as required by the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act.

Laws 1971, LB 496, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 43-638;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 1.

Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, see section 48-1125.

This section setting forth the policy of the state to employ the blind and visually handicapped does not require the employment of firemen with visual handicaps where that disability would prevent the performance of the work involved. McCrea v. Cunningham, 202 Neb. 638, 277 N.W.2d 52 (1979).